Massachusetts, session 194th, H3353.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3B of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “function” in line 14, the
following words:-
provided, that no additional surcharge shall be assessed due to payment method where
such method, whether by check, credit card, electronic means or other instrument, is approved
for use;
SECTION 2. Section 63 of Chapter 109 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clause (b) and inserting in place thereof the
following clause:-
of 2

(b) The fee for filing the annual report shall be $450, or such amount as the secretary
shall designate; provided, however, that no additional surcharge shall be assessed due to payment
method where such method, whether by check, credit card, electronic means or other instrument,
is approved for use.
SECTION 3. Section 16.22 of Chapter 156D of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following clause:- (d) When filing said
annual report, no additional surcharge shall be assessed due to payment method where such
method, whether by check, credit card, electronic means or other instrument, is approved for use.
of 2